Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Cross references. —

As to rights of accused in criminal prosecutions generally, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For rules of supreme court relating to criminal procedure, see Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1985, ch. 147, §§ 1 through 3, and Laws 1987, ch. 157, §§ 1, 3, 4, and 5, revised this title.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1, added §§ 7-1-123, 7-7-108, 7-7-109, 7-8-124 and 7-11-212, which were amended and renumbered by Laws 1987, ch. 157, §§ 4 and 5, as §§

7-1-103

,

7-7-104

,

7-7-105

,

7-8-105

, and

7-11-206

, respectively.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2, and Laws 1987, ch. 157, §§ 4 and 5, amended and renumbered former §§

7-3-222

,

7-6-101

,

7-7-101

,

7-7-102

, 7-7-107,

7-8-101

,

7-8-103

, 7-8-107, 7-8-110,

7-9-101

,

7-9-107

,

7-10-101

,

7-10-102

,

7-10-105

,

7-10-106

, 7-10-117, 7-10-120,

7-11-101

through

7-11-107

,

7-11-201

,

7-11-202

, 7-11-207, 7-11-210, 7-11-211,

7-11-301

,

7-11-303

through

7-11-307

,

7-11-401

,

7-11-402

,

7-11-406

through 7-11-410,

7-11-501

,

7-11-503

, 7-11-514 through 7-11-516, 7-11-518,

7-12-101

through

7-12-103

, 7-12-105, 7-12-205 and

7-12-301

as present §§

7-1-104

through

7-1-106

,

7-3-222

,

7-7-101

through

7-7-103

,

7-8-101

through

7-8-104

,

7-10-101

through

7-10-106

,

7-11-101

through

7-11-107

,

7-11-201

through

7-11-205

,

7-11-301

,

7-11-303

through

7-11-307

,

7-11-401

through

7-11-407

,

7-11-501

through

7-11-506

,

7-12-101

through

7-12-104

,

7-12-201

, and

7-12-301

.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 3, repealed former §§

7-6-102

through

7-6-113

, 7-6-201 through 7-6-204, 7-6-206 through 7-6-217,

7-7-103

through 7-7-106,

7-8-102

,

7-8-104

through

7-8-106

, 7-8-108, 7-8-109, 7-8-111 through 7-8-123,

7-9-102

through

7-9-106

,

7-9-108

through 7-9-122,

7-10-103

,

7-10-104

, 7-10-107 through 7-10-116, 7-10-118, 7-10-119, 7-10-121, 7-11-108,

7-11-203

through

7-11-206

, 7-11-208, 7-11-209,

7-11-403

through

7-11-405

, 7-11-411 through 7-11-417, 7-11-420,

7-11-502

,

7-11-504

through 7-11-513, 7-11-601 through 7-11-604,

7-12-104

,

7-12-201

through 7-12-204, 7-12-206, 7-12-207,

7-12-302

,

7-12-303

,

7-16-101

through 7-16-127, 7-16-129 through 7-16-133 and

7-16-201

through 7-16-211.

Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 1, added § 7-3-611.

Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3, amended and renumbered former §§ 6-3-702(c),

6-10-110

,

7-1-101

through

7-5-309

,

7-13-101

through 7-15-107 and

7-17-101

through

7-17-103

as §§

7-1-101

through 7-6-115 (now §§ 7-1-101 through

7-6-114

; see Laws 1987, ch. 176, below),

7-9-101

through

7-9-112

, and

7-13-101

through

7-17-103

(but see repeal of §§

7-13-601

through 7-13-614, below).

Also, former §§

7-1-107

through 7-1-119 and 7-1-121 were amended and renumbered as present §§

7-6-101

through

7-6-114

, and former § 7-1-120 was repealed, by Laws 1987, ch. 176, §§ 1 and 2, respectively.

Also, §

7-11-408

was added by Laws 1987, ch. 149, § 1.

Also, chapter 19 (§§

7-19-101

through

7-19-109

) was added by Laws 1987, ch. 163, § 1, and chapter 20 (§§

7-20-101

through

7-20-107

) was added by Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1.

In addition, various sections in this title were added and amended by Laws 1985, chs. 150, 181, 212 and 219, Laws 1986, chs. 49, 63 and 65, and Laws 1987, chs. 30, 77, 109, 126, 135, 138, 152, 175, 205 and 212. Where there were conflicts between these additions and amendments and the revision of this title by Laws 1985, ch. 147, and Laws 1987, ch. 157, the sections are set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Former §

7-13-104

was also repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 138, § 2, before being deleted by Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Former §§

7-13-601

through 7-13-614 were also repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 41, § 1.

Former § 7-13-707 was also repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 46, § 2, before being deleted by Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Section

7-11-302

, §§

7-18-101

through

7-18-107

, and

7-18-109

through

7-18-114

, were unaffected by Laws 1985, ch. 147, or any 1987 legislation.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1985 and 1987 acts has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections, and annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be useful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 6, provides: “The amendment to W.S. 7-13-202 made by this act does not apply to any criminal case in which the sentencing court has imposed a sentence prior to the effective date of this act.”

Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 7, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 8, makes the act effective on May 22, 1987.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The State, Attorney General and the Changing Face of Criminal Law,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 1 (1964).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).